Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1315
Certified environmental health specialist; misrepresentation; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to represent himself or herself as a registered environmental health specialist without being duly certified and the holder of a currently valid certificate issued by the department. An individual holding a certificate of registration as a registered environmental health specialist on December 1, 2008, shall be deemed to be certified as a registered environmental health specialist on such date. An individual holding a certificate of registration as a trainee on December 1, 2008, shall be deemed to be certified as a provisional environmental health specialist on such date.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 14, p. 1285;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 49;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3714;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 536.